Tennessee, session 114, SB2378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 2, Chapter 12, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
If a county election commission receives a bonafide complaint of a violation of a
person's right to vote in an election, the county election commission shall document the
details of the complaint and electronically submit the complaint to the state election
commission.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2378
012598
- 1 -